District of Columbia statutes.
50-1107

Regulations by Mayor.

The Mayor of the District of Columbia shall make such regulations as in his judgment are necessary for the administration of this chapter, and may affix thereto such reasonable fines and penalties as in his judgment are necessary to enforce such regulations. The Mayor may issue any rules or regulations or amend any existing rules or regulations as needed to comply with the requirements of federal laws and regulations in implementing the District’s vehicle exhaust emission regulation and inspection program, or as needed to comply with federal grant eligibility requirements.

History

Feb. 18, 1938, 52 Stat. 78, ch. 31, § 7
Apr. 26, 1994, D.C. Law 10-106, § 2(b), 41 DCR 1014

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 40-207.
1973 Ed., § 40-207.